Illinois, session 104th, HB4577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.18 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.18)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.18)7    Sec. 10-22.18. Kindergartens. 8    (a) As used in this subsection (a), "play-based learning" 9means either teacher-initiated play or student-initiated play. 10In this definition, "teacher-initiated play" means intentional 11teacher-directed play with activities set up and led by a 12teacher that are aligned to learning goals or standards, and 13"student-initiated play" means child-selected opportunities to 14build, pretend, create, move, or explore in an environment 15intentionally curated by a teacher to align with learning 16goals or standards. 17    To establish kindergartens for the instruction of children 18between the ages of 4 and 6 years and to pay the necessary 19expenses thereof out of the school funds of the district. 20Until the 2027-2028 school year, upon petition of at least 50 21parents or guardians of children between the ages of 4 and 6, 22residing within any school district and within one mile of the 23public school where such kindergarten is proposed to be   HB4577 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17463 LNS 30889 b1established, the board of directors shall, if funds are 2available, establish a kindergarten in connection with the 3public school designated in the petition and maintain it as 4long as the annual average daily attendance therein is not 5less than 15. Until the 2027-2028 school year, the board may 6establish a kindergarten with half-day attendance or with 7full-day attendance; however, if the board establishes 8full-day kindergarten, it shall also establish half-day 9kindergarten. Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each 10school board must establish a kindergarten with full-day 11attendance and may establish a kindergarten with half-day 12attendance. Full-day and half-day kindergarten should be 13developmentally appropriate and provide opportunities for 14play-based learning. No one shall be employed to teach in a 15kindergarten who does not hold a license as provided by law.16    (b) An elementary or unit school district that does not 17offer full-day kindergarten as of October 1, 2022, may, by 18action of the State Board of Education, apply for an extension 19of the 2027-2028 school year implementation deadline for 2 20additional years if one of the following criteria are met:21        (1) the school district is funded below 76% of 22    adequacy according to the Evidence-Based Funding formula 23    under Section 18-8.15 of this Code in Fiscal Year 2023;24        (2) the school district is ranked in the top 25% of 25    capital funding need by the Full-Day Kindergarten Task 26    Force, but has yet to receive capital funding as of the   HB4577 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17463 LNS 30889 b1    date of the application; or 2        (3) the school district meets a criterion set by the 3    State Board of Education based on the Full-Day 4    Kindergarten Task Force's recommendations under subsection 5    (b) of Section 10-22.18e of this Code. 6(Source: P.A. 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-410, eff. 8-2-23.)